Nevada, session 83, AB517.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 427A of NRS is hereby amended by
adding thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. The Department, through the Division, shall conduct a
program to:
(a) Develop and carry out a public awareness campaign to
provide information to the public about the importance of
planning for long-term care that provides information relevant to
the changing demographics of this State. A public awareness
campaign carried out pursuant to this paragraph must use various
forms of media, including, without limitation, television and
digital platforms, to ensure the campaign reaches a wide audience
throughout this State.
(b) Create and maintain on the Internet website of the Division
comprehensive information on the resources and tools available to
residents of this State to assist residents of this State with planning
for long-term care.
(c) Coordinate with financial planners, providers of health
care, insurance companies and community organizations to
provide throughout this State workshops, seminars and
educational sessions that provide information on planning for
long-term care.
(d) Prepare planning guides, brochures and other printed
material and make such materials available to the public,
community centers and other relevant organizations that may
distribute such materials to residents of this State. The materials
prepared and made available pursuant to this paragraph must
incorporate a range of educational materials, including electronic
and physical materials, that offer detailed information about the
options for long-term care, tools for planning for long-term care
and financial assistance with long-term care that are available to
residents of this State.
2. In carrying out the provisions of subsection 1, the
Department, through the Division, shall:
(a) Incorporate best practices from other states and engage a
diverse range of stakeholders, including, without limitation,
financial planners, providers of health care, insurance companies,
senior advocacy groups, nonprofit and grassroots organizations,
and local government agencies that work with the elderly
population in this State, with an emphasis on engaging with
organizations that have significant connections to the elderly
population in this State and a thorough understanding of the
-
*AB517*

– 3 –
unique needs and challenges experienced by different segments of
the elderly population in this State.
(b) Address specific demographic segments within the elderly
population in this State, including, without limitation, persons
who are not proficient in the English language, veterans and
residents of rural communities, to ensure the inclusivity and
accessibility of resources.
3. The Department, through the Division, may implement the
provisions of subsection 1 in phases, with initial priority given to
areas of this State with a high concentration of elderly persons
and persons with limited access to long-term planning resources.
The Department may select counties in this State to host pilot
programs to test and refine outreach and delivery strategies for
implementation statewide.
4. The Department, through the Division, shall develop a
framework to monitor, evaluate and assess the effectiveness of the
program set forth in subsection 1 and to adapt the program as
necessary. In monitoring, evaluating, assessing and adapting the
program, the Department, through the Division, shall gather input
from participants and stakeholders, including, without limitation,
nonprofit and grassroots organizations.
5. On or before February 1 of each year, the Administrator
shall submit a report to the Director of the Legislative Counsel
Bureau for transmittal:
(a) In even-numbered years, to the Legislative Commission,
the Joint Interim Standing Committee on Health and Human
Services and the Legislative Committee on Senior Citizens,
Veterans and Adults With Special Needs; and
(b) In odd-numbered years, to the next regular session of the
Legislature.
6. The Division may adopt regulations to carry out the
provisions of this section.
Sec. 2. The provisions of NRS 218D.380 do not apply to any
provision of this act which adds or revises a requirement to submit a
report to the Legislature.
Sec. 3. This act becomes effective upon passage and approval.
H
-
*AB517*